src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_alga_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - kiksâ:
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Nom: kiksâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Gen: kiivsâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Acc: kiivsâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Ill: kiiksân
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Loc: kiivsâst
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Com: kivssáin
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Abe: kivsâttáá
    kiksâ+N+Ess: kiksân
    kiksâ+N+Par: kiksâd
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Nom: kiivsah
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kiivsâi, kivsâi]
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Acc: kiivsâid
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Ill: kivssáid
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Loc: kiivsâin
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Com: [kivsâiguin, kivsâigijn]
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Abe: kivsâittáá

  Noun - lahcâ:
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Nom: lahcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahcân
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavcâst
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Com: lavccáin
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Abe: lavcâttáá
    lahcâ+N+Ess: lahcân
    lahcâ+N+Par: lahcâd
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavcah
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laavcâi, lavcâi]
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavcâid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavccáid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavcâin
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Com: [lavcâiguin, lavcâigijn]
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Abe: lavcâittáá
    
  Noun - tekstâ:
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Nom: tekstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Gen: teevstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Acc: teevstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Ill: teekstân
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Loc: teevstâst
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Com: tevstáin
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Abe: tevstâttáá
    tekstâ+N+Ess: tekstân
    tekstâ+N+Par: tekstâd
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Nom: teevstah
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Gen: [teevstâi, tevstâi]
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Acc: teevstâid
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Ill: tevstáid
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Loc: teevstâin
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Com: [tevstâiguin, tevstâigijn]
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Abe: tevstâittáá
